Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.  ORS 656.210 is amended to read:
656.210. [(1) When the total disability is only temporary, the worker shall receive  during the period
of that total disability compensation equal to 66-2/3 percent of wages, but not more than 133  percent
of the average weekly wage nor less than the amount of 90 percent of  wages a week or the amount of
$50 a week, whichever amount is less. ]
(1)(a) During a period of  total disability that is temporary, the worker shall receive
compensation equal to:
(A) Seventy-five percent of the worker’s wage that is equal to or less than 75 percent of
the average weekly wage in effect on the date  of injury, but not less than the amount of 90
percent of the worker’s wage a week or the amount of $50 a week, whichever  amount is less;
and
(B) Sixty-five percent of the worker’s wage that  is greater than 75 percent of the average
weekly wage, but not more than 133 percent of the average weekly wage, in effect on the date
of injury.
(b) Notwithstanding the limitation imposed by this  subsection, an injured worker who is not
otherwise  eligible  to receive an increase in benefits for the fiscal year in which compensation is paid
shall have the benefits increased each  fiscal year by the percentage which the applicable average
weekly wage has increased since the previous fiscal year.
(2)(a) For the purpose of this section, the weekly  wage of workers shall be [ ascertained] calcu-
lated:
(A) For  workers employed in one job at the time of injury, by multiplying the daily wage the
worker was receiving by the number of days per week that the worker was regularly employed; or
(B) For  workers employed in more than one job at the time of injury, by adding all earnings the
worker was receiving from all subject employment.
(b) Notwithstanding paragraph (a)(B) of this subsection, the weekly  wage calculated under par-
agraph (a)(A) of this subsection shall be used for workers  employed in more than one job at the time
of injury unless the insurer, self-insured employer or assigned claims  agent for a noncomplying em-
ployer  receives:
(A) Within 30 days of receipt of the initial claim, notice that the worker was employed  in more
than one job with a subject employer at the time of injury; and
Enrolled Senate Bill 1519 (SB 1519-A) Page 1
(B) Within  60 days of the date of mailing a request for verification, verifiable documentation of
wages from such additional employment.
(c) Notwithstanding ORS 656.005  (7)(c), an injury to a worker employed in more than one job
at the time of injury is not disabling if no temporary disability benefits  are payable for time lost
from the job at injury. Claim costs incurred as a  result of supplemental temporary disability benefits
paid as provided in subsection (5) of this section may not be included  in any data used for
ratemaking or individual employer rating or dividend calculations by  an insurer, a rating organiza-
tion licensed pursuant to ORS  chapter 737, the State Accident Insurance Fund Corporation or the
Department of  Consumer and Business Services if the injured worker is not eligible for permanent
disability benefits or temporary disability benefits for time lost from the job at injury.
(d) For the purpose of this section:
(A) The benefits of a worker who incurs an injury shall be based on the wage of the worker  at
the time of injury.
(B) The benefits of  a worker who incurs an occupational disease shall be based on the wage of
the worker at the time there is medical verification that the worker is  unable to work because of
the disability caused by the  occupational disease. If the worker is not working at the time that there
is medical verification that the worker is unable to  work because of the disability caused by the
occupational disease, the benefits shall be based on the wage of the worker at the worker’s last
regular employment.
(e) As used in this subsection, “regularly  employed” means actual employment or availability for
such employment. For workers not regularly employed  and for workers with no remuneration or
whose remuneration is not based solely upon daily or weekly wages, the Director  of the Department
of Consumer and Business Services,  by rule, may prescribe methods for establishing the worker’s
weekly wage.
(3) No disability payment is recoverable for  temporary total or partial disability suffered during
the first three calendar days after the worker leaves  work or loses wages as a result of the
compensable injury unless the worker is totally disabled  after the injury and the total disability
continues  for  a period of 14 consecutive days or unless the worker is admitted as an inpatient to a
hospital within 14 days of the first  onset of total disability. If the worker leaves work or loses wages
on the day of the injury due to the injury, that day shall be considered  the first day of the three-day
period.
(4) When an injured worker with an accepted disabling compensable injury is required to  leave
work to receive compensable medical  services for the compensable injury, the worker shall receive
temporary disability benefits calculated  pursuant to ORS 656.212 for the period during which the
worker is absent, until such time as the worker is determined to be medically stationary. However,
benefits under this  subsection are not payable if wages are paid for the period of absence by the
employer. An insurer may require a worker to confirm the period  during which the worker is absent
from work to  receive compensable medical services under this subsection. The notice requirement
under ORS 656.262 (4)(j) does not apply to temporary disability  benefits paid pursuant to this sub-
section.
(5)(a) The insurer of the employer at injury or the self-insured employer at injury, may  elect to
be responsible for payment of supplemental temporary disability benefits to a worker employed in
more than one job at the time of injury. In accordance with rules adopted by  the director, if the
worker’s weekly wage is  determined under subsection (2)(a)(B) of this section, the insurer or self-
insured employer shall be reimbursed from the Workers’ Benefit Fund  for the amount of temporary
disability benefits paid that exceeds the amount payable pursuant  to subsection (2)(a)(A) of this
section had the worker been employed in only one job at the time of  injury. Such reimbursement
shall include an administrative fee  payable to the insurer or self-insured employer pursuant to rules
adopted by the director.
(b) If  the insurer or self-insured employer elects not to pay the supplemental temporary disabil-
ity benefits for a worker employed in more than  one job at the time of injury, the director shall
Enrolled Senate Bill 1519 (SB 1519-A) Page 2
either administer and pay the supplemental benefits directly or shall assign responsibility  to ad-
minister and process the payment to a paying agent selected by the director.
(6) The director shall adopt rules for  the payment and reimbursement of supplemental temporary
disability benefits under this section.
SECTION 2.  ORS 656.211 is amended to read:
656.211. As used in ORS 656.210 (1) (b), “average weekly  wage” means the average weekly wage
of workers in covered employment in Oregon, as determined  by the Employment Department, for the
last quarter of the calendar year preceding the fiscal year  in which compensation is paid and as
computed by the Employment Department as of May 15 of each year.
SECTION 3. The amendments to ORS 656.210 and 656.211 by sections 1 and 2 of this  2026
Act apply to claims with a date of injury on or after January 1, 2027.
SECTION 4.  ORS 656.206 is amended to read:
656.206. (1) As used in this section:
(a) “Essential functions” means the primary tasks associated with the job.
(b) “Materially improved medically” means an actual change for the better in  the worker’s
medical condition that is supported by objective findings.
(c) “Materially improved vocationally” means an actual change for the better in the:
(A) Worker’s vocational capability; or
(B) Likelihood that the worker can return to work in a gainful and suitable occupation.
(d) “Permanent total disability” means, notwithstanding ORS 656.225, the loss, including  preex-
isting disability, of use or function of any portion  of the body which permanently incapacitates the
worker from regularly performing work at a gainful and suitable occupation.
(e) “Regularly performing work” means the ability of the worker to discharge the  essential
functions of the job.
(f) “Suitable occupation” means one that the worker has the  ability and the training or experi-
ence to perform, or an occupation that the worker is able to perform after rehabilitation.
(g) “Wages” means wages as determined under ORS 656.210.
[(2) If permanent total disability results from a  worker’s injury, the worker shall receive during the
period of  that disability compensation benefits equal to 66-2/3 percent of wages, no more than 133 per-
cent of the average weekly wage or no less than 33 percent of the average weekly wage. ]
(2) During the period of permanent total disability that results from a worker’s injury,
the worker shall receive compensation equal to:
(a) Seventy-five percent of the worker’s wage that  is equal to or less than 75 percent of
the average weekly wage, but not less than 33 percent of the average weekly wage, in effect
on the date of injury; and
(b) Sixty-five percent of the worker’s wage that is greater than 75 percent of  the average
weekly wage, but not more than 133 percent of the average weekly wage, in effect on the date
of injury.
(3) A worker has the burden of proving permanent total  disability status and must establish that
the worker is willing to seek regular gainful employment and that the worker has made reasonable
efforts to obtain such employment.
(4) When requested by the Director  of the Department of Consumer and Business Services, a
worker who receives permanent  total disability benefits shall file on a form provided by the director,
a sworn statement of the worker’s  gross annual income for the preceding year along with such other
information as the director considers necessary to determine whether  the worker regularly performs
work at a gainful and suitable occupation.
(5) Each  insurer shall reexamine periodically each permanent total disability claim for which the
insurer has current payment responsibility  to determine whether the worker has materially im-
proved, either medically or vocationally, and is no longer permanently incapacitated from  regularly
performing work at a gainful and suitable occupation. Reexamination must  be conducted every two
years or at such  other more frequent interval as the director may prescribe. Reexamination must
Enrolled Senate Bill 1519 (SB 1519-A) Page 3
include such medical examinations, vocational evaluations, reports and  other records as the insurer
considers necessary or the director may require.
(6)(a) If a worker receiving permanent total disability benefits is found to be materially improved
and capable of regularly performing work at a gainful and suitable occupation, the insurer or  self-
insured employer shall  issue a notice of closure pursuant to ORS 656.268. Permanent total disability
benefits shall be paid through the date of the notice of closure. Notwithstanding ORS  656.268 (5),
if a worker objects to  a notice of closure issued under this subsection, the worker shall request a
hearing. If the worker requests a hearing on the notice of closure before the Hearings  Division of
the Workers’ Compensation Board within 30 days of the date of the notice  of closure, the insurer
or self-insured employer shall  continue payment of permanent total disability benefits until an order
of the Hearings Division or a subsequent order affirms the notice of  closure or until another order
that terminates the worker’s benefits  becomes final. If the worker requests a hearing on the notice
of closure more than 30 days from the date of the notice  of closure but before the 60-day period for
requesting a hearing expires,  the insurer or self-insured employer shall resume paying permanent
total disability benefits from the date  the hearing is requested and shall continue payment of bene-
fits until an order of the Hearings Division or a subsequent order  affirms the notice of closure or
until another order that terminates the worker’s benefits  becomes final. If the notice of closure is
upheld by the Hearings Division, the  insurer or self-insured employer must be reimbursed from the
Workers’ Benefit Fund for the amount of permanent  total disability benefits paid after the date of
the notice of closure issued under this subsection.
(b) An insurer or self-insured employer must establish that the condition of a worker who  is
receiving permanent total disability benefits has materially improved by a preponderance of the ev-
idence presented at hearing.
(c) Medical examinations or vocational evaluations used to support the issuance of a notice of
closure  under  this subsection must include at least one report in which the author personally ob-
served the worker.
(d) Notwithstanding section 54 (3), chapter 2, Oregon Laws  1990, the Hearings Division of the
Workers’ Compensation Board may request  the director to order a medical arbiter examination of
an injured worker who has requested a hearing under this subsection.
(7) A  worker who has had permanent total disability benefits terminated under this section by
an order that has become final is eligible for vocational assistance pursuant  to ORS 656.340.
Notwithstanding ORS 656.268 (10), if a worker has enrolled in and is actively engaged  in a training
program, when vocational assistance provided under this section ends or the worker ceases to be
enrolled and actively engaged in the training program, the insurer or  the self-insured employer shall
determine the extent of disability pursuant to ORS 656.214.
(8) A worker receiving permanent total disability benefits is required, if requested by the  di-
rector, the insurer or the  self-insured employer, to submit to a vocational evaluation at a time rea-
sonably convenient to the worker as may be provided by the rules of the director. No  more than
three evaluations  may be requested except after notification to and authorization by the director.
If the worker refuses to submit to or obstructs a vocational evaluation, the rights of the  worker to
compensation must be suspended  with the consent of the director until the evaluation has taken
place, and no compensation is payable for the period during which the worker refused to  submit to
or obstructed the evaluation. The insurer or self-insured employer shall  pay the costs of the evalu-
ation and related services that are  reasonably necessary to allow the worker to attend the evalu-
ation requested under this  subsection. As used in this subsection, “related services” includes, but
is not limited to, wages, child care, travel, meals and lodging.
(9) Notwithstanding any other provisions of this chapter, if a worker receiving  permanent total
disability incurs a new compensable injury, the worker’s entitlement to compensation for the new
injury shall be limited to medical benefits pursuant to  ORS 656.245 and permanent partial disability
benefits for impairment, as determined in the manner set forth in ORS 656.214 (2).
(10) When a worker  eligible for benefits under this section returns to work, if the combined total
of the worker’s post-injury wages plus permanent total disability benefit exceeds the worker’s  wage
Enrolled Senate Bill 1519 (SB 1519-A) Page 4
at the time of injury, the worker’s permanent total disability benefit must be reduced by the  amount
the worker’s wages plus statutory permanent total disability  benefit exceeds the worker’s wage at
injury.
(11) For purposes of this section:
(a) A gainful occupation for workers with a date of injury prior to January 1, 2006, who were:
(A) Employed continuously for 52 weeks prior to the injury, is  an occupation that provides
weekly wages that are the lesser of the most recent federal poverty  guidelines for a family of three
that are applicable to Oregon residents and that are published  annually in the Federal Register by
the United States  Department of Health and Human Services or 66-2/3 percent of the worker’s av-
erage weekly wages from all employment for the 52 weeks prior to the date of injury.
(B) Not employed continuously for the 52 weeks prior to the date of injury, but who  were em-
ployed for at least four weeks prior to the date of injury, is an occupation  that provides weekly
wages that are the lesser of the most recent federal poverty guidelines for a family of  three that
are applicable to Oregon residents  and that are published annually in the Federal Register by the
United States Department of Health and Human Services or 66-2/3 percent  of the worker’s average
weekly wage from all employment for the 52 weeks prior to the date of injury based  on weeks of
actual employment, excluding any extended periods of unemployment.
(C) Employed for less than four weeks prior to the date of injury with no other  employment
during the 52 weeks prior  to the date of injury, is an occupation that provides weekly wages that
are the lesser of the most recent  federal poverty guidelines for a family of three that are applicable
to Oregon residents and that  are published annually in the Federal Register by the United States
Department of Health and  Human Services or 66-2/3 percent of the average weekly wages intended
by the parties at the time of initial hire.
(b) A  gainful occupation for workers with a date of injury on or after January 1, 2006, who were:
(A) Employed continuously for 52  weeks prior to the injury, is an occupation that provides
weekly wages that are the lesser of the most recent federal poverty  guidelines for a family of three
that are applicable to Oregon residents and  that are published annually in the Federal Register by
the United States Department of Health and Human Services or 66-2/3 percent of the  worker’s av-
erage weekly wages from all employment for the 52 weeks prior to  the date of injury adjusted by
the percentage of change in the applicable federal poverty guidelines for a family of three  from the
date of injury to the date of evaluation of the extent of the worker’s disability.
(B) Not employed continuously for the 52 weeks prior to the date of injury, but who  were em-
ployed for at least four weeks prior to the date of injury, is an occupation  that provides weekly
wages that are the lesser of the most recent federal poverty guidelines for a family of  three that
are applicable to Oregon residents  and that are published annually in the Federal Register by the
United States Department of Health and Human Services or 66-2/3 percent  of the worker’s average
weekly wage from all employment for the 52 weeks prior to the date of injury based  on weeks of
actual employment, excluding any extended periods of unemployment and as adjusted by the per-
centage of change in the applicable federal poverty guidelines for a family of three  from the date
of injury to the date of evaluation of the extent of the worker’s disability.
(C) Employed for less than four weeks prior to the date of injury with no other  employment
during the 52 weeks prior  to the date of injury, is an occupation that provides weekly wages that
are the lesser of the most recent  federal poverty guidelines for a family of three that are applicable
to Oregon residents and that  are published annually in the Federal Register by the United States
Department of Health and  Human Services or 66-2/3 percent of the average weekly wages intended
by the parties at the time of initial hire adjusted by  the percentage of change in the applicable
federal poverty guidelines for a family of three from  the date of injury to the date of evaluation of
the extent of the worker’s disability.
SECTION 5.
The amendments to ORS 656.206 by section 4 of  this 2026 Act apply to claims
with a date of injury on or after January 1, 2027.
Enrolled Senate Bill 1519 (SB 1519-A) Page 5
Passed by Senate February 27, 2026
..................................................................................
Obadiah Rutledge, Secretary of Senate
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Passed by House March 3, 2026
..................................................................................
Julie Fahey, Speaker of House
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2026
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2026
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2026
..................................................................................
Tobias Read, Secretary of State
Enrolled Senate Bill 1519 (SB 1519-A) Page 6